California, session 20252026, AB958.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66602 of the Education Code is amended to read:66602. (a) The board shall be composed of the following five ex officio members: the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Speaker of the Assembly, and the person named by the trustees to serve as the Chancellor of the California State University; a representative of the alumni associations of the state university, selected for a two-year term by the alumni council, California State University, which representative shall not be an employee of the California State University during the two-year term; and 17 appointive members appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by two-thirds of the membership of the Senate.(b) (1) Two students from the California State University, who shall have at least sophomore year standing at the institutions they attend, and who remain in good standing as students during their respective terms, shall also be appointed by the Governor to serve on the board for two-year terms. terms as provided in paragraph (3).(2) In selecting students as members of the board, the Governor shall appoint the students from lists of names of at least two, but not more than five, persons furnished by the governing board of any statewide student organization that represents the students of the California State University and the student body organizations of the campuses of the California State University. Any appointment to fill a vacancy of a student member shall be effective only for the remainder of the term of the student member’s office that became vacated.(3) The term of office of one student member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an even-numbered year and expire on June 30 two years thereafter. The term of office of the other student member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an odd-numbered year and expire on June 30 two years thereafter. Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a student member who graduates from the student member’s college or university on or after January 1 of the second year of the student member’s term of office may serve the remainder of the term. If the Governor has not appointed a successor pursuant to this subdivision, a student member whose term of office expires on June 30 of any year may remain in office until January 1 of the following year, or until a successor is appointed by the Governor, whichever occurs first.(4) A student member shall have the student member’s tuition fee waived for the duration of the student member’s term of office.(c) (1) Two faculty members from the California State University, each of whom shall be tenured at the California State University campus at which the faculty member teaches, shall also be appointed by the Governor to serve on the board for two-year terms. terms as provided in paragraph (3). In selecting each faculty members member as members a member of the board, board for their respective term, the Governor shall appoint the each faculty members member from a list of names of at least four two persons furnished annually by the Academic Senate of the California State University.(2) The faculty members of the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to this subdivision shall not participate on any subcommittee of the board responsible for collective bargaining negotiations.(3) The two-year term of office of one faculty member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an even-numbered year and expire on June 30 two years thereafter. The two-year term of office of the other faculty member of the board shall commence on July 1 of an odd-numbered year and expire on June 30 two years thereafter. If the Governor has not appointed a successor under paragraph (1), a faculty member may remain in office after the term expires for one additional year, or until a successor is appointed by the Governor, whichever occurs first.(d) (1) Members of the board shall be selected from outstanding lay citizens of California who have a strong interest in the further development and improvement of the California State University.(2) Members of the board, to the greatest extent possible, should be inclusive and representative of the many demographic groups found in California, and the board should reflect diversity of race and gender, and should include, among others, disabled persons and veterans. In furtherance of the mission of the California State University, a member of the board should embrace the basic role and responsibility of a member of the board to bring their own best thinking and personal views to the board’s discussion, determining their own position on each issue rather than being bound to represent or advocate for the positions of a particular organization or constituency.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 1. ___________________